District of Columbia statutes.
8-1423

Prohibition on shipments of hazardous materials.

Except in cases of emergency, it shall be illegal in the Capitol Exclusion Zone, without a permit, to:

(1)

Transport any of the following:

(A)

Explosives of Class 1, Division 1.1, or Class 1, Division 1.2, as designated in 49 C.F.R. § 173.2, in a quantity greater than 500 kilograms;

(B)

Flammable gasses of Class 2, Division 2.1, as designated in 49 C.F.R. § 173.2, in a quantity greater than 10,000 liters;

(C)

Poisonous gasses of Class 2, Division 2.3, as designated in 49 C.F.R. § 173.2, in a quantity greater than 500 liters, and belonging to Hazard Zones A or B, as defined in 49 C.F.R. § 173.116; and

(D)

Poisonous materials, other than gasses, of Class 6, Division 6.1, in a quantity greater than 1,000 kilograms, and belonging to Hazard Zones A or B, as defined in 49 C.F.R. § 173.133; or

(2)

Operate a vehicle or move a rail car which:

(A)

Is capable of containing explosives of Class 1, Division 1.1, or Class 1, Division 1.2, as designated in 49 C.F.R. § 173.2, in a quantity greater than 500 kilograms, and has exterior placarding or other markings indicating that it contains such materials;

(B)

Is capable of containing flammable gasses of Class 2, Division 2.1, as designated in 49 C.F.R. § 173.2, in a quantity greater than 10,000 liters, and has exterior placarding or other markings indicating that it contains such materials;

(C)

Is capable of containing poisonous gasses of Class 2, Division 2.3, as designated in 49 C.F.R. § 173.2, in a quantity greater than 500 liters, and belonging to Hazard Zones A or B, as defined in 49 C.F.R. § 173.116, and has exterior placarding or other markings indicating that it contains such materials; or

(D)

Is capable of containing poisonous materials, other than gasses, of Class 6, Division 6.1, in a quantity greater than 1,000 kilograms, and belonging to Hazard Zones A or B, as defined in 49 C.F.R. § 173.133, and has exterior placarding or other markings indicating that it contains such materials.

Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-80, § 4, 53 DCR 1047
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4 of Terrorism Prevention in Hazardous Materials Transportation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-325, March 23, 2006, 53 DCR 2576).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4 of Second Terrorism Prevention in Hazardous Materials Transportation Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-236, December 22, 2005, 53 DCR 245).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4 of Terrorism Prevention in Hazardous Materials Transportation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-90, June 1, 2005, 52 DCR 5428).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4 of Terrorism Prevention in Hazardous Materials Transportation Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-43, February 15, 2005, 52 DCR 3048).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 4 of Terrorism Prevention in Hazardous Materials Transportation Temporary Act of 2005 (D.C. Law 16-2, May 14, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 5425).
This section is referenced in § 8-1424 and § 8-1425.